Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.050

Appropriations for administrative costs.

The legislature shall appropriate from the personnel service fund for the payment of administrative costs of the productivity board.

[ 2023 c 106 s 4; 2022 c 297 s 950; 2021 c 334 s 967; 2019 c 415 s 960; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 965; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 952; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 970. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 937; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 473; 1991 sp.s. c 16 s 918; 1987 c 387 s 4; 1985 c 114 s 3; 1983 c 54 s 3; 1982 c 167 s 11; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 122 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 152 s 6; 1965 ex.s. c 142 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 297: See note following RCW 43.79.565.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective dates—2015 3rd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 28B.15.069.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—Effective date—1991 sp.s. c 16: See notes following RCW 9.46.100.

Effective date—1985 c 114: See note following RCW 41.60.015.

Severability—1982 c 167: See note following RCW 41.60.015.

Personnel service fund: RCW 41.06.280.